California statutes. Civil Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 983, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

798.83.

In the case of a sale or transfer of a mobilehome that will remain in the park, the management of the park shall not require repairs or improvements to the park space or property owned by the management, except for damage caused by the actions or negligence of the homeowner or an agent of the homeowner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 367, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Actions, Proceedings, and Penalties [798.84. - 798.88.]

798.84.

(a) No action based upon the management’s alleged failure to maintain the physical improvements in the common facilities in good working order or condition or alleged reduction of service may be commenced by a homeowner unless the management has been given at least 30 days’ prior notice of the intention to commence the action.

(b) The notice shall be in writing, signed by the homeowner or homeowners making the allegations, and shall notify the management of the basis of the claim, the specific allegations, and the remedies requested. A notice by one homeowner shall
 be deemed to be sufficient notice of the specific allegation to the management of the park by all of the homeowners in the park.

(c) The notice may be served in the manner prescribed in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1010) of Title 14 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) For purposes of this section, management shall be deemed to be notified of an alleged failure to maintain the physical improvements in the common facilities in good working order or condition or of an alleged reduction of services upon substantial compliance by the homeowner or homeowners with the provisions of subdivisions (b) and (c), or when management has been notified of the alleged failure to maintain or the alleged reduction of services by a state or local agency.

(e) If the notice is served within 30 days of the expiration of the
 applicable statute of limitations, the time for the commencement of the action shall be extended 30 days from the service of the notice.

(f) This section does not apply to actions for personal injury or wrongful death.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1592, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

798.85.

In any action arising out of the provisions of this chapter the prevailing party shall be entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees and costs. A party shall be deemed a prevailing party for the purposes of this section if the judgment is rendered in his or her favor or where the litigation is dismissed in his or her favor prior to or during the trial, unless the parties otherwise agree in the settlement or compromise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 519, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

798.86.

(a) If a homeowner or former homeowner of a park is the prevailing party in a civil action, including a small claims court action, against the management to enforce his or her rights under this chapter, the homeowner, in addition to damages afforded by law, may, in the discretion of the court, be awarded an amount not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000) for each willful violation of this chapter by the management.

(b) A homeowner or former homeowner of a park who is
 the prevailing party in a civil action against management to enforce his or her rights under this chapter may be awarded either punitive damages pursuant to Section 3294 of the Civil Code or the statutory penalty provided by subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 98, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

798.87.

(a) The substantial failure of the management to provide and maintain physical improvements in the common facilities in good working order and condition shall be deemed a public nuisance. Notwithstanding Section 3491, this nuisance may only be remedied by a civil action or abatement.

(b) The substantial violation of a mobilehome park rule shall be deemed a public nuisance. Notwithstanding Section 3491, this nuisance may only be remedied by a civil action or
 abatement.

(c) A civil action pursuant to this section may be brought by a park resident, the park management, or in the name of the people of the State of California, by any of the following:

(1) The district attorney or the county counsel of the jurisdiction in which the park, or the greater portion of the park, is located.

(2) The city attorney or city prosecutor if the park is located within the jurisdiction of the city.

(3) The Attorney General.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 141, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

798.88.

(a) In addition to any right under Article 6 (commencing with Section 798.55) to terminate the tenancy of a homeowner, any person in violation of a reasonable rule or regulation of a mobilehome park may be enjoined from the violation as provided in this section.

(b) A petition for an order enjoining a continuing or recurring violation
 of any reasonable rule or regulation of a mobilehome park may be filed by the management thereof within the limited jurisdiction of the superior court of the county in which the mobilehome park is located. At the time of filing the petition, the petitioner may obtain a temporary restraining order in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 527 of the Code of Civil Procedure. A temporary order restraining the violation may be granted, with notice, upon the petitioner’s affidavit showing to the satisfaction of the court reasonable proof of a continuing or recurring violation of a rule or regulation of the mobilehome park by the named homeowner or resident and that great or irreparable harm would result to the management or other homeowners or residents of the park from continuance or recurrence of the violation.

(c) A temporary restraining order granted pursuant to this subdivision shall be personally served upon the respondent homeowner or
 resident with the petition for injunction and notice of hearing thereon. The restraining order shall remain in effect for a period not to exceed 15 days, except as modified or sooner terminated by the court.

(d) Within 15 days of filing the petition for an injunction, a hearing shall be held thereon. If the court, by clear and convincing evidence, finds the existence of a continuing or recurring violation of a reasonable rule or regulation of the mobilehome park, the court shall issue an injunction prohibiting the violation. The duration of the injunction shall not exceed three years.

(e) However, not more than three months prior to the expiration of an injunction issued pursuant to this section, the management of the mobilehome park may petition under this section for a new injunction where there has been recurring or continuous violation of the injunction or there is a threat of
 future violation of the mobilehome park’s rules upon termination of the injunction.

(f) Nothing shall preclude a party to an action under this section from appearing through legal counsel or in propria persona.

(g) The remedy provided by this section is nonexclusive and nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude or limit any rights the management of a mobilehome park may have to terminate a tenancy.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 99, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2015, Ch. 176, Sec. 1.   (SB 244)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Subdivisions, Cooperatives, and Condominiums [799. - 799.13.]

799.

As used in this article:

(a) “Ownership or management” means the ownership or management of a subdivision, cooperative, or condominium for mobilehomes, or of a resident-owned mobilehome park.

(b) “Resident” means a person who maintains a residence in a subdivision, cooperative, or condominium for mobilehomes, or a resident-owned mobilehome park.

(c) “Resident-owned
 mobilehome park” means any entity other than a subdivision, cooperative, or condominium for mobilehomes, through which the residents have an ownership interest in the mobilehome park.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 72, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

799.1.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), this article shall govern the rights of a resident who has an ownership interest in the subdivision, cooperative, or condominium for mobilehomes, or a resident-owned mobilehome park in which his or her mobilehome is located or installed. In a subdivision, cooperative, or condominium for mobilehomes, or a resident-owned mobilehome park, Article 1 (commencing
 with Section 798) to Article 8 (commencing with Section 798.84), inclusive, shall apply only to a resident who does not have an ownership interest in the subdivision, cooperative, or condominium for mobilehomes, or the resident-owned mobilehome park, in which his or her mobilehome is located or installed.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), in a mobilehome park owned and operated by a nonprofit mutual benefit corporation, established pursuant to Section 11010.8 of the Business and Professions Code, whose members consist of park residents where there is no recorded subdivision declaration or condominium plan, Article 1 (commencing with Section 798) to Article 8 (commencing with Section 798.84), inclusive, shall govern the rights of members who are residents that rent their space from the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 492, Sec. 1.   (SB 1421)   Effective September 23, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

799.1.5.

A homeowner or resident, or an heir, joint tenant, or personal representative of the estate who gains ownership of a mobilehome through the death of the resident of the mobilehome who was a resident at the time of his or her death, or the agent of any of those persons, may advertise the sale or exchange of his or her mobilehome or, if not prohibited by the terms of an agreement with the management or ownership, may advertise the rental of his or her mobilehome by displaying a sign in the window of the mobilehome, or by a sign posted on the side of the
 mobilehome facing the street, or by a sign in front of the mobilehome facing the street, stating that the mobilehome is for sale or exchange or, if not prohibited, for rent by the owner of the mobilehome or his or her agent. Any such person also may display a sign conforming to these requirements indicating that the mobilehome is on display for an “open house,” unless the park rules prohibit the display of an open house sign. The sign shall state the name, address, and telephone number of the owner of the mobilehome or his or her agent. The sign face may not exceed 24 inches in width and 36 inches in height. Signs posted in front of a mobilehome pursuant to this section may be of an H-frame or A-frame design with the sign face perpendicular to, but not extending into, the street. A homeowner or resident, or an heir, joint tenant, or personal representative of the estate who gains ownership of a mobilehome through the death of the resident of the mobilehome who was a resident at the time of his or her death,
 or the agent of any of those persons, may attach to the sign or their mobilehome tubes or holders for leaflets that provide information on the mobilehome for sale, exchange, or rent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

799.2.

The ownership or management shall not show or list for sale a mobilehome owned by a resident without first obtaining the resident’s written authorization. The authorization shall specify the terms and conditions regarding the showing or listing.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to affect the provisions of the Health and Safety Code governing the licensing of mobilehome salesmen.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 519, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

799.2.5.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the ownership or management shall have no right of entry to a mobilehome without the prior written consent of the resident. The consent may be revoked in writing by the resident at any time. The ownership or management shall have a right of entry upon the land upon which a mobilehome is situated for maintenance of utilities, trees, and driveways, for maintenance of the premises in accordance with the rules and regulations of the subdivision, cooperative, or condominium for mobilehomes, or
 resident-owned mobilehome park when the homeowner or resident fails to so maintain the premises, and protection of the subdivision, cooperative, or condominium for mobilehomes, or resident-owned mobilehome park at any reasonable time, but not in a manner or at a time that would interfere with the resident’s quiet enjoyment.

(b) The ownership or management may enter a mobilehome without the prior written consent of the resident in case of an emergency or when the resident has abandoned the mobilehome.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

799.3.

The ownership or management shall not require the removal of a mobilehome from a subdivision, cooperative, or condominium for mobilehomes, or resident-owned mobilehome park in the event of its sale to a third party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 72, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

799.4.

The ownership or management may require the right to prior approval of the purchaser of a mobilehome that will remain in the subdivision, cooperative, or condominium for mobilehomes, or resident-owned mobilehome park and that the selling resident, or his or her agent give notice of the sale to the ownership or management before the close of the sale. Approval cannot be withheld if the purchaser has the financial ability to pay the fees and charges of the subdivision, cooperative, or condominium for mobilehomes, or resident-owned mobilehome park unless the
 ownership or management reasonably determines that, based on the purchaser’s prior residences, he or she will not comply with the rules and regulations of the subdivision, cooperative, or condominium for mobilehomes, or resident-owned mobilehome park.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 72, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

799.5.

The ownership or management may require that a purchaser of a mobilehome that will remain in the subdivision, cooperative, or condominium for mobilehomes, or resident-owned mobilehome park comply with any rule or regulation limiting residency based on age requirements for housing for older persons, provided that the rule or regulation complies with the provisions of the federal Fair Housing Act, as amended by Public Law 104-76, and implementing regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 72, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

799.6.

No agreement shall contain any provision by which the purchaser waives his or her rights under the provisions of this article. Any such waiver shall be deemed contrary to public policy and void and unenforceable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 519, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

799.7.

The ownership or management shall provide, by posting notice on the mobilehomes of all affected homeowners and residents, at least 72 hours’ written advance notice of an interruption in utility service of more than two hours for the maintenance, repair, or replacement of facilities of utility systems over which the management has control within the subdivision, cooperative, or condominium for mobilehomes, or resident-owned mobilehome park, if the interruption is not due to an emergency. The ownership or management shall be liable only for actual damages
 sustained by a homeowner or resident for violation of this section.

“Emergency,” for purposes of this section, means the interruption of utility service resulting from an accident or act of nature, or cessation of service caused by other than the management’s regular or planned maintenance, repair, or replacement of utility facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 72, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

799.8.

The management, at the time of an application for residency, shall disclose in writing to any person who proposes to purchase or install a manufactured home or mobilehome on a space or lot, on which the construction of the pad or foundation system commenced after September 1, 1986, and no other manufactured home or mobilehome was previously located, installed, or occupied, that the manufactured home or mobilehome may be subject to a school facilities fee under Sections 53080 and 53080.4 of, and Chapter 4.9 (commencing with Section 65995) of Division 1 of
 Title 7 of, the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 983, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

799.9.

(a) A homeowner may share his or her mobilehome with any person 18 years of age or older if that person is providing live-in health care, live-in supportive care, or supervision to the homeowner. Management shall not charge a fee for the live-in caregiver, but may require written confirmation from a licensed health care professional of the need for the care or supervision, if the need is not readily apparent or
 already known to management. That person shall have no rights of tenancy in, and shall comply with the rules and regulations of, the subdivision, cooperative, or condominium for mobilehomes, or resident-owned mobilehome park.

(b) A senior homeowner who resides in a subdivision, cooperative, or condominium for mobilehomes, or a resident-owned mobilehome park, that has implemented rules or regulations limiting residency based on age requirements for housing for older persons, pursuant to Section 799.5, may share his or her mobilehome with any person 18 years of age or older if this person is a parent, sibling, child, or grandchild of the senior homeowner and requires live-in health care, live-in supportive care, or supervision. Management shall not charge a fee for this parent, sibling, child, or grandchild, but may require written confirmation from a licensed health care professional of the need for the care or supervision, if the need is not
 readily apparent or already known to management. Unless otherwise agreed upon, the management shall not be required to manage, supervise, or provide for this person’s care during his or her stay in the subdivision, cooperative, or condominium for mobilehomes, or resident-owned mobilehome park. That person shall have no rights of tenancy in, and shall comply with the rules and regulations of, the subdivision, cooperative, or condominium for mobilehomes, or resident-owned mobilehome park. As used in this subdivision, “senior homeowner” means a homeowner or resident who is 55 years of age or older.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 767, Sec. 2.   (SB 147)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

799.10.

A resident may not be prohibited from displaying a political campaign sign relating to a candidate for election to public office or to the initiative, referendum, or recall process in the window or on the side of a manufactured home or mobilehome, or within the site on which the home is located or installed. The size of the face of a political sign may not exceed six square feet, and the sign may not be displayed in
 excess of a period of time from 90 days prior to an election to 15 days following the election, unless a local ordinance within the jurisdiction where the manufactured home or mobilehome subject to this article is located imposes a more restrictive period of time for the display of such a sign. In the event of a conflict between the provisions of this section and the provisions of Part 5 (commencing with Section 4000) of Division 4, relating to the size and display of political campaign signs, the provisions of this section shall prevail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 181, Sec. 27.   (AB 806)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 86 of Ch. 181.)
-------------------------------------------

799.11.

The ownership or management shall not prohibit a homeowner or resident from installing accommodations for the disabled on the home or the site, lot, or space on which the mobilehome is located, including, but not limited to, ramps or handrails on the outside of the home, as long as the installation of those facilities complies with code, as determined by an enforcement agency, and those facilities are installed pursuant to a permit, if required for the installation, issued by the enforcement agency. The management may require that the accommodations
 installed pursuant to this section be removed by the current homeowner at the time the mobilehome is removed from the park or pursuant to a written agreement between the current homeowner and the management prior to the completion of the resale of the mobilehome in place in the park. This section is not exclusive and shall not be construed to condition, affect, or supersede any other provision of law or regulation relating to accessibility or accommodation for the disabled.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 170, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

799.12.

(a) Any covenant, restriction, or condition contained in any rental agreement or other instrument affecting the tenancy of a homeowner or resident in a subdivision, cooperative, or condominium for mobilehomes, or resident-owned mobilehome park that effectively prohibits or restricts the installation or use of a solar energy system on the mobilehome or the site, lot, or space on which the mobilehome is located is void and unenforceable.

(b) Ownership or management shall not prohibit or restrict a homeowner or resident from installing or using a solar energy system on a mobilehome or the site, lot, or space on which the mobilehome is located. Ownership or
 management shall not do any of the following:

(1) Charge any fee to a homeowner or resident in connection with the installation or use of a solar energy system.

(2) Require a homeowner or resident to use a specific solar installation contractor or solar energy system or product.

(3) Claim or receive any rebate, credit, or commission in connection with a homeowner’s or resident’s installation or use of a solar energy system.

(c) This section does not apply to imposition of reasonable restrictions on solar energy systems. However, it is the policy of the state to promote and encourage the use of solar energy systems and to remove obstacles thereto. Accordingly,
 reasonable restrictions on a solar energy system are those restrictions that do not significantly increase the cost of the system or significantly
 decrease its efficiency or specified performance, or that allow for an alternative system of comparable cost, efficiency, and energy conservation benefits.

(d) (1) For purposes of this section, “solar energy system” has the same meaning as defined in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 801.5.

(2) A solar energy system shall meet applicable health and safety standards and requirements imposed by state and local permitting authorities, consistent with Section 65850.5 of the Government Code.

(3) Solar energy systems and solar collectors used for heating water shall be certified by an accredited listing agency as defined in the California Plumbing and Mechanical
 Codes.

(4) A solar energy system for producing electricity shall also meet all applicable safety and performance standards established by the California Electrical Code, the Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers, and accredited testing laboratories such as Underwriters Laboratories and, if applicable, rules of the Public Utilities Commission regarding safety and reliability.

(e) This section shall not apply to a master-meter park. “Master-meter park” as used in this section means “master-meter customer” as used in Section 739.5 of the Public Utilities Code.

(f) Any entity that willfully violates this section shall be liable to the homeowner, resident, or other party for actual damages occasioned thereby, and
 shall pay a civil penalty to the homeowner, resident, or other party in an amount not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(g) In any action to enforce compliance with this section, the prevailing party shall be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 162, Sec. 2.   (SB 1190)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

799.13.

(a) Any covenant, restriction, or condition contained in any rental agreement or other instrument affecting the tenancy of a homeowner or resident in a subdivision, cooperative, or condominium for mobilehomes, or resident-owned mobilehome park that effectively prohibits or restricts the installation, upgrade, replacement, or use of a cooling system in a mobilehome is void and unenforceable.

(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), ownership or management shall not prohibit or restrict a homeowner or resident from installing, upgrading, replacing, or using a cooling system in their mobilehome. Management shall not do any of the following:

(A) Charge any fee to a homeowner or resident in connection with the installation, upgrade, replacement, or use of a cooling system.

(B) Require a homeowner or resident to use a specific cooling system, type of cooling system, or cooling system contractor or product.

(C) Claim or receive any rebate, credit, or commission in connection with a homeowner’s or resident’s installation, upgrade, replacement, or use of a cooling system.

(D) Require homeowners or residents to remove cooling systems or prevent replacements or upgrades to existing cooling systems.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply if
 ownership or management establishes any of the following:

(A) The installation, upgrade, replacement, or use of the cooling system would violate federal, state, or local law.

(B) A permit from a designated permitting authority is required for the installation, upgrade, replacement, or use of the cooling system, and that permit is not granted.

(C) The amperage required to power any individual cooling system cannot be accommodated by the power service to the lot, as demonstrated in writing by a federal, state, or local governmental enforcement authority.

(c) For purposes of this section, “cooling system”
 can include, but is not limited to, a portable air-conditioning unit, a window air-conditioning unit, a swamp cooler or any evaporative cooler, a cooling fan system, a heat pump, or any other technology that reasonably creates an internal temperature cooling benefit. A cooling system shall meet applicable health and safety standards and requirements imposed by law.

(d) The tenancy of a homeowner or resident shall not be terminated for the installation, upgrade, replacement, or use of a cooling system as permitted under this section.

(e) Any entity that willfully violates this section shall be liable to the homeowner, resident, or other party for actual damages occasioned thereby, and shall pay a civil penalty to the homeowner, resident, or other party in an amount not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(f) In any action to enforce compliance with this section, the prevailing party shall be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 343, Sec. 2.   (AB 806)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.6. Recreational Vehicle Park Occupancy Law [799.20. - 799.79.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [799.20. - 799.32.]

799.20.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Recreational Vehicle Park Occupancy Law.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

799.21.

Unless the provisions or context otherwise require, the following definitions shall govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

799.22.

“Defaulting occupant” means an occupant who fails to pay for his or her occupancy in a park or who fails to comply with reasonable written rules and regulations of the park given to the occupant upon registration.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

799.23.

“Defaulting resident” means a resident who fails to pay for his or her occupancy in a park, fails to comply with reasonable written rules and regulations of the park given to the resident upon registration or during the term of his or her occupancy in the park, or who violates any of the provisions contained in Article 5 (commencing with Section 799.70).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

799.24.

“Defaulting tenant” means a tenant who fails to pay for his or her occupancy in a park or fails to comply with reasonable written rules and regulations of the park given to the person upon registration or during the term of his or her occupancy in the park.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

799.25.

“Guest” means a person who is lawfully occupying a recreational vehicle located in a park but who is not an occupant, tenant, or resident. An occupant, tenant, or resident shall be responsible for the actions of his or her guests.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

799.26.

“Management” means the owner of a recreational vehicle park or an agent or representative authorized to act on his or her behalf in connection with matters relating to the park.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

799.27.

“Occupancy” and “occupy” refer to the use of a recreational vehicle park lot by an occupant, tenant, or resident.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

799.28.

“Occupant” means the owner or operator of a recreational vehicle who has occupied a lot in a park for 30 days or less.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

799.29.

“Recreational vehicle” has the same meaning as defined in Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

799.30.

“Recreational vehicle park” or “park” has the same meaning as defined in Section 18862.39 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 530, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

799.31.

“Resident” means a tenant who has occupied a lot in a park for nine months or more.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

799.32.

“Tenant” means the owner or operator of a recreational vehicle who has occupied a lot in a park for more than 30 consecutive days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [799.40. - 799.47.]

799.40.

The rights created by this chapter shall be cumulative and in addition to any other legal rights the management of a park may have against a defaulting occupant, tenant, or resident, or that an occupant, tenant, or resident may have against the management of a park.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

799.41.

Nothing in this chapter shall apply to a mobilehome as defined in Section 18008 of the Health and Safety Code or to a manufactured home as defined in Section 18007 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

799.42.

No occupant registration agreement or tenant rental agreement shall contain a provision by which the occupant or tenant waives his or her rights under the provisions of this chapter, and any waiver of these rights shall be deemed contrary to public policy and void.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

799.43.

The registration agreement between a park and an occupant thereof shall be in writing and shall contain, in addition to the provisions otherwise required by law to be included, the term of the occupancy and the rent therefor, the fees, if any, to be charged for services which will be provided by the park, and a statement of the grounds for which a defaulting occupant’s recreational vehicle may be removed as specified in Section 799.22 without a judicial hearing after the service of a 72-hour notice pursuant to this chapter and the telephone number of the
 local traffic law enforcement agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

799.44.

At the time of registration, an occupant shall be given a copy of the rules and regulations of the park.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

799.45.

The management may offer a rental agreement to an occupant of the park who intends to remain in the park for a period in excess of 30 consecutive days.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

799.46.

At the entry to a recreational vehicle park, or within the separate designated section for recreational vehicles within a mobilehome park, there shall be displayed in plain view on the property a sign indicating that the recreational vehicle may be removed from the premises for the reasons specified in Sections 799.22 and 1866 and containing the telephone number of the local traffic law enforcement agency. Nothing in this section shall prevent management from additionally displaying the sign in other locations within the park.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 530, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

799.47.

(a) A person shall not require an occupant, tenant, or resident in a qualified recreational vehicle park to reregister if the purpose of the reregistration requirement is to prevent the occupant, tenant, or resident from gaining or maintaining status as a resident.

(b) A person who violates subdivision (a) shall be liable for a civil penalty of five hundred dollars ($500).

(c) In an action brought pursuant to this section, if it is established by a preponderance of the evidence that an occupant, tenant, or resident was
 required to reregister, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that the purpose of that requirement was to prevent the occupant, tenant, or resident from gaining or
 maintaining status as a resident.

(d) In an action brought pursuant to this section, the court shall award reasonable attorney’s fees and costs to the prevailing party.

(e) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Qualified recreational vehicle park” means a recreational vehicle park, as defined in Section 799.30, that is located within the City of Imperial Beach.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 799.31 “resident” means a tenant who has occupied a lot in a park for at least 9 months in a 12-month period.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 351, Sec. 1.   (AB 1472)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Defaulting Occupants [799.55. - 799.59.]

799.55.

Except as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 1866, as a prerequisite to the right of management to have a defaulting occupant’s recreational vehicle removed from the lot which is the subject of the registration agreement between the park and the occupant pursuant to Section 799.57, the management shall serve a 72-hour written notice as prescribed in Section 799.56. A defaulting occupant may correct his or her payment deficiency within the 72-hour period during normal business hours.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 530, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

799.56.

(a) The 72-hour written notice shall be served by delivering a copy to the defaulting occupant personally or to a person of suitable age and discretion who is occupying the recreational vehicle located on the lot. In the latter event, a copy of the notice shall also be affixed in a conspicuous place on the recreational vehicle and shall be sent through the mail addressed to the occupant at the place where the property is located and, if available, any other address which the occupant has provided to management in the registration
 agreement. Delivery of the 72-hour notice to a defaulting occupant who is incapable of removing the occupant’s recreational vehicle from the park because of a physical incapacity shall not be sufficient to satisfy the requirements of this section.

(b) In the event that the defaulting occupant is incapable of removing the occupant’s recreational vehicle from the park because of a physical incapacity or because the recreational vehicle is not motorized and cannot be moved by the occupant’s vehicle, the default shall be cured within 72 hours, but the date to quit shall be no less than seven days after service of the notice.

(c) The management shall also serve a copy of the notice to the city police if the park is located in a city, or, if the park is located in an unincorporated area, to the county sheriff.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

799.57.

The written 72-hour notice shall state that if the defaulting occupant does not remove the recreational vehicle from the premises of the park within 72 hours after receipt of the notice, the management has authority pursuant to Section 799.58 to have the recreational vehicle removed from the lot to the nearest secured storage facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

799.58.

Subsequent to serving a copy of the notice specified in this article to the city police or county sheriff, whichever is appropriate, and after the expiration of 72 hours following service of the notice on the defaulting occupant, the police or sheriff, shall remove or cause to be removed any person in the recreational vehicle. The management may then remove or cause the removal of a defaulting occupant’s recreational vehicle parked on the premises of the park to the nearest secured storage facility. The notice shall be void seven days after the date of
 service of the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)